it: Guanto tipo MMA: Da competizione; Da grappling; Ibrido; Da sparring; Da allenamento; Da ragazzo; Altro
fr: Type de gant de MMA: Compétition; Lutte; Hybride; Sparring; Entraînement; Jeune; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta MMA rukavice: Natjecanje; Grappling; Hibrid; Sparing; Trening; Za mlade; Ostalo
nb: Type MMA-hanske: Konkurranse; Grappling; Hybrid; Sparring; Trening; Ungdom; Annet
hu: MMA-kesztyű típusa: Verseny; Grappling; Hibrid; Sparring; Edző; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
lt-LT: MMA pirštinių tipas: Varžybų; Imtynių; Hibridinės; Sparingo; Treniruočių; Jaunimo; Kita
bg-BG: Вид ръкавица за ММА: За състезания; За граплинг; Хибридни; За спаринг; За тренировка; За юноши; Друго
cs: Typ rukavice pro MMA: Závodní; Grapplingové; Hybridní; Sparringové; Tréninkové; Dětské / juniorské; Jiné
ko: MMA 글러브 유형: 대회용; 그래플링용; 하이브리드; 스파링용; 훈련용; 아동/청소년용; 기타
th: ประเภทถุงมือ MMA: สำหรับแข่งขัน; สำหรับจับล็อก; ลูกผสม; สำหรับซ้อมประลอง; สำหรับฝึกซ้อม; สำหรับเยาวชน; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип перчаток MMA: Для соревнований; Для грэпплинга; Гибридные; Для спарринга; Тренировочные; Юношеские; Другое
ja: MMAグローブタイプ: コンペティション; グラップリング; ハイブリッド; スパーリング; トレーニング; ユース; その他
tr: MMA eldiveni türü: Müsabaka; Grappling; Karma; Sparring; Antrenman; Genç; Diğer
vi: Loại găng tay MMA: Thi đấu; Khóa xiết; Lai; Đối kháng; Tập luyện; Thiếu niên; Khác
en: MMA glove type: Competition; Grappling; Hybrid; Sparring; Training; Youth; Other
es: Tipo de guante de MMA: Competición; Grappling; Híbrido; Sparring; Entrenamiento; Juvenil; Otro
fi: MMA-käsineen tyyppi: Kilpailu; Grappling; Hybridi; Sparraus; Harjoittelu; Nuoret; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de mănușă MMA: Competiție; Grappling; Hibrid; Sparring; Antrenament; Tineret; Altele
el: Τύπος γαντιού MMA: Αγώνων; Πάλης (grappling); Υβριδικά; Ανταγωνιστικής προπόνησης (sparring); Προπόνησης; Παιδικά; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta rokavic za MMA: Tekmovalne; Grappling; Hibridne; Za sparing; Za trening; Mladinske; Drugo
sv: Typ av MMA-handske: Tävling; Grappling; Hybrid; Sparring; Träning; Ungdom; Annan
de: MMA-Handschuhtyp: Wettkampf; Grappling; Hybrid; Sparring; Training; Jugend; Sonstige
nl: MMA-handschoen type: Wedstrijd; Grappling; Hybride; Sparren; Training; Jeugd; Overig
zh-CN: MMA 拳套类型: 比赛; 缠斗; 混合; 对打练习; 训练; 青少年; 其他
pt-BR: Luva de MMA tipo: Competição; Grappling; Híbrida; Sparring; Treino; Infantil; Outro
da: MMA-handsketype: Konkurrence; Grappling; Hybrid; Sparring; Træning; Ungdom; Andet
zh-TW: MMA 手套類型: 比賽用; 纏鬥用; 混合型; 對打用; 訓練用; 青少年用; 其他
pl: Typ rękawic MMA: Zawody; Grappling; Hybrydowe; Sparing; Trening; Dla młodzieży; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de luva de MMA: Competição; Grappling; Híbrida; Sparring; Treino; Jovem; Outro
sk-SK: Typ rukavíc na MMA: Súťažné; Grappling; Hybridné; Sparingové; Tréningové; Pre mládež; Iné